third_party/hunspell_dictionaries/tg_TG.aff
FLAG num
SFX 344 N 20
SFX 344 0 иҳо .
SFX 344 0 иҳоанд .
SFX 344 0 иҳову .
SFX 344 0 иҳои .
SFX 344 0 иҳоро .
SFX 344 0 иҳост .
SFX 344 0 иҳою .
SFX 344 0 иҳоям .
SFX 344 0 иҳоямон .
SFX 344 0 иҳоямонро .
SFX 344 0 иҳоямро .
SFX 344 0 иҳоянд .
SFX 344 0 иҳоят .
SFX 344 0 иҳоятон .
SFX 344 0 иҳоятонро .
SFX 344 0 иҳоятро .
SFX 344 0 иҳояш .
SFX 344 0 иҳояшон .
SFX 344 0 иҳояшонро .
SFX 344 0 иҳояшро .

SFX 345 N 3
SFX 345 0 иҳое .
SFX 345 0 иҳоеро .
SFX 345 0 иҳоест .

SFX 346 N 4
SFX 346 0 иҷон .
SFX 346 0 иҷонам .
SFX 346 0 иҷони .
SFX 346 0 иҷонро .

SFX 347 N 1
SFX 347 0 иҷот .

SFX 348 N 9
SFX 348 0 ибон .
SFX 348 0 ибонам .
SFX 348 0 ибонамон .
SFX 348 0 ибонанд .
SFX 348 0 ибонат .
SFX 348 0 ибонаш .
SFX 348 0 ибони .
SFX 348 0 ибонро .
SFX 348 0 ибону .

SFX 349 N 3
SFX 349 0 ибонӣ .
SFX 349 0 ибонии .
SFX 349 0 ибонию .

SFX 350 N 1
SFX 350 0 ибоне .

SFX 351 N 1
SFX 351 0 ибонони .

SFX 352 N 1
SFX 352 0 ивар .

SFX 353 N 1
SFX 353 0 ивон .

SFX 354 N 1
SFX 354 0 ивонӣ .

SFX 355 N 1
SFX 355 0 ивор .

SFX 356 N 5
SFX 356 0 игӣ .
SFX 356 0 игиашонро .
SFX 356 0 игиашро .
SFX 356 0 игиву .
SFX 356 0 игии .

SFX 357 N 1
SFX 357 0 игаҳ .

SFX 358 N 1
SFX 358 0 игаҳе .

SFX 359 N 1
SFX 359 0 игар .

SFX 360 N 11
SFX 360 0 игарӣ .
SFX 360 0 игариамро .
SFX 360 0 игариат .
SFX 360 0 игариатон .
SFX 360 0 игариаш .
SFX 360 0 игариашонро .
SFX 360 0 игариашро .
SFX 360 0 игариву .
SFX 360 0 игарии .
SFX 360 0 игариро .
SFX 360 0 игарию .

SFX 361 N 1
SFX 361 0 игаре .

SFX 362 N 2
SFX 362 0 игариҳо .
SFX 362 0 игариҳои .

SFX 363 N 1
SFX 363 0 игарон .

SFX 364 N 1
SFX 364 0 игин .

SFX 365 N 1
SFX 365 0 игоҳ .

SFX 366 N 25
SFX 366 0 ид .
SFX 366 0 идам .
SFX 366 0 идамат .
SFX 366 0 идамаш .
SFX 366 0 идаму .
SFX 366 0 иданд .
SFX 366 0 идандат .
SFX 366 0 идандаш .
SFX 366 0 идандашон .
SFX 366 0 иданду .
SFX 366 0 идаст .
SFX 366 0 идастанд .
SFX 366 0 идасту .
SFX 366 0 идат .
SFX 366 0 идатон .
SFX 366 0 идаш .
SFX 366 0 идашон .
SFX 366 0 идашро .
SFX 366 0 идашу .
SFX 366 0 идед .
SFX 366 0 идеду .
SFX 366 0 идем .
SFX 366 0 идему .
SFX 366 0 идро .
SFX 366 0 иду .

SFX 367 N 1
SFX 367 0 идҳо .

SFX 368 N 5
SFX 368 0 идӣ .
SFX 368 0 идиву .
SFX 368 0 идию .
SFX 368 0 идиям .
SFX 368 0 идияш .

SFX 369 N 26
SFX 369 0 ида .
SFX 369 0 идаам .
SFX 369 0 идаамон .
SFX 369 0 идаамонро .
SFX 369 0 идаамро .
SFX 369 0 идааму .
SFX 369 0 идаанд .
SFX 369 0 идаанду .
SFX 369 0 идааст .
SFX 369 0 идаасту .
SFX 369 0 идаат .
SFX 369 0 идаатон .
SFX 369 0 идаатонро .
SFX 369 0 идаатро .
SFX 369 0 идааш .
SFX 369 0 идаашон .
SFX 369 0 идаашонро .
SFX 369 0 идаашро .
SFX 369 0 идаву .
SFX 369 0 идаед .
SFX 369 0 идаеду .
SFX 369 0 идаем .
SFX 369 0 идаему .
SFX 369 0 идаи .
SFX 369 0 идаро .
SFX 369 0 идаю .

SFX 370 N 5
SFX 370 0 идаҳо .
SFX 370 0 идаҳои .
SFX 370 0 идаҳоро .
SFX 370 0 идаҳоят .
SFX 370 0 идаҳояш .

SFX 371 N 2
SFX 371 0 идаӣ .
SFX 371 0 идаиву .

SFX 372 N 1
SFX 372 0 идаастӣ .

SFX 373 N 1
SFX 373 0 идавор .

SFX 374 N 10
SFX 374 0 идагӣ .
SFX 374 0 идагиамро .
SFX 374 0 идагиашро .
SFX 374 0 идагиву .
SFX 374 0 идагии .
SFX 374 0 идагиро .
SFX 374 0 идагист .
SFX 374 0 идагистанд .
SFX 374 0 идагию .
SFX 374 0 идагиямонро .

SFX 375 N 5
SFX 375 0 идагиҳо .
SFX 375 0 идагиҳои .
SFX 375 0 идагиҳост .
SFX 375 0 идагиҳояш .
SFX 375 0 идагиҳояшон .

SFX 376 N 1
SFX 376 0 идагиҳое .

SFX 377 N 1
SFX 377 0 идагие .

SFX 378 N 5
SFX 378 0 идагон .
SFX 378 0 идагонанд .
SFX 378 0 идагонат .
SFX 378 0 идагони .
SFX 378 0 идагонро .

SFX 379 N 2
SFX 379 0 идагор .
SFX 379 0 идагорашро .

SFX 380 N 3
SFX 380 0 идае .
SFX 380 0 идаеву .
SFX 380 0 идаеро .

SFX 381 N 1
SFX 381 0 идаме .

SFX 382 N 13
SFX 382 0 идан .
SFX 382 0 иданам .
SFX 382 0 иданамон .
SFX 382 0 иданамро .
SFX 382 0 иданат .
SFX 382 0 иданатон .
SFX 382 0 иданаш .
SFX 382 0 иданашон .
SFX 382 0 иданашонро .
SFX 382 0 иданашро .
SFX 382 0 идани .
SFX 382 0 иданро .
SFX 382 0 идану .

SFX 383 N 4
SFX 383 0 иданҳо .
SFX 383 0 иданҳову .
SFX 383 0 иданҳои .
SFX 383 0 иданҳоят .

SFX 384 N 11
SFX 384 0 иданӣ .
SFX 384 0 иданиам .
SFX 384 0 иданианд .
SFX 384 0 иданиашон .
SFX 384 0 иданиву .
SFX 384 0 иданием .
SFX 384 0 идании .
SFX 384 0 иданиро .
SFX 384 0 иданист .
SFX 384 0 иданию .
SFX 384 0 иданиям .

SFX 385 N 2
SFX 385 0 идане .
SFX 385 0 иданест .

SFX 386 N 3
SFX 386 0 иданиҳо .
SFX 386 0 иданиҳои .
SFX 386 0 иданиҳояш .

SFX 387 N 1
SFX 387 0 идание .

SFX 388 N 1
SFX 388 0 идастӣ .

SFX 389 N 1
SFX 389 0 идатар .

SFX 390 N 1
SFX 390 0 идатарин .

SFX 391 N 6
SFX 391 0 идгор .
SFX 391 0 идгоратон .
SFX 391 0 идгораш .
SFX 391 0 идгори .
SFX 391 0 идгорро .
SFX 391 0 идгору .

SFX 392 N 2
SFX 392 0 идгорӣ .
SFX 392 0 идгорияш .

SFX 393 N 1
SFX 393 0 идгорони .

SFX 394 N 2
SFX 394 0 идон .
SFX 394 0 идони .

SFX 395 N 8
SFX 395 0 идор .
SFX 395 0 идорам .
SFX 395 0 идоранду .
SFX 395 0 идорат .
SFX 395 0 идораш .
SFX 395 0 идори .
SFX 395 0 идорро .
SFX 395 0 идору .

SFX 396 N 1
SFX 396 0 идорҳои .

SFX 397 N 4
SFX 397 0 идорӣ .
SFX 397 0 идориаш .
SFX 397 0 идории .
SFX 397 0 идориро .

SFX 398 N 1
SFX 398 0 идоре .

SFX 399 N 5
SFX 399 0 идорон .
SFX 399 0 идоронаш .
SFX 399 0 идорони .
SFX 399 0 идоронро .
SFX 399 0 идорону .

SFX 400 N 1
SFX 400 0 идорона .

SFX 401 N 2
SFX 401 0 идороне .
SFX 401 0 идоронеро .

SFX 402 N 5
SFX 402 0 ие .
SFX 402 0 иеву .
SFX 402 0 иеро .
SFX 402 0 иерост .
SFX 402 0 иест .

SFX 403 N 1
SFX 403 0 иё .

SFX 404 N 4
SFX 404 0 иев .
SFX 404 0 иеви .
SFX 404 0 иевро .
SFX 404 0 иеву .

SFX 405 N 3
SFX 405 0 иевҳо .
SFX 405 0 иевҳои .
SFX 405 0 иевҳоро .

SFX 406 N 2
SFX 406 0 иева .
SFX 406 0 иеваро .

SFX 407 N 1
SFX 407 0 иевич .

SFX 408 N 1
SFX 408 0 иевна .

SFX 409 N 15
SFX 409 0 иён .
SFX 409 0 иёнам .
SFX 409 0 иёнамон .
SFX 409 0 иёнанд .
SFX 409 0 иёнат .
SFX 409 0 иёнатон .
SFX 409 0 иёнатонро .
SFX 409 0 иёнаш .
SFX 409 0 иёнашон .
SFX 409 0 иёнашонро .
SFX 409 0 иёнашро .
SFX 409 0 иёнем .
SFX 409 0 иёни .
SFX 409 0 иёнро .
SFX 409 0 иёну .

SFX 410 N 1
SFX 410 0 иёнӣ .

SFX 411 N 7
SFX 411 0 иёна .
SFX 411 0 иёнаамон .
SFX 411 0 иёнааш .
SFX 411 0 иёнаву .
SFX 411 0 иёнаи .
SFX 411 0 иёнаро .
SFX 411 0 иёнаю .

SFX 412 N 1
SFX 412 0 иёнае .

SFX 413 N 3
SFX 413 0 иёне .
SFX 413 0 иёнеро .
SFX 413 0 иёнест .

SFX 414 N 10
SFX 414 0 иёт .
SFX 414 0 иётам .
SFX 414 0 иётанд .
SFX 414 0 иётатон .
SFX 414 0 иёташ .
SFX 414 0 иёташон .
SFX 414 0 иёташро .
SFX 414 0 иёти .
SFX 414 0 иётро .
SFX 414 0 иёту .

SFX 415 N 3
SFX 415 0 иётҳо .
SFX 415 0 иётҳои .
SFX 415 0 иётҳоро .

SFX 416 N 1
SFX 416 0 иётҳое .

SFX 417 N 2
SFX 417 0 иётӣ .
SFX 417 0 иётии .

SFX 418 N 1
SFX 418 0 иёте .

SFX 419 N 1
SFX 419 0 изор .

SFX 420 N 1
SFX 420 0 имонанд .

SFX 421 N 20
SFX 421 0 ин .
SFX 421 0 инад .
SFX 421 0 инам .
SFX 421 0 инамон .
SFX 421 0 инамонро .
SFX 421 0 инамро .
SFX 421 0 инаму .
SFX 421 0 инанд .
SFX 421 0 инат .
SFX 421 0 инатон .
SFX 421 0 инатонро .
SFX 421 0 инатро .
SFX 421 0 инаш .
SFX 421 0 инашон .
SFX 421 0 инашонро .
SFX 421 0 инашро .
SFX 421 0 инем .
SFX 421 0 ини .
SFX 421 0 инро .
SFX 421 0 ину .

SFX 422 N 3
SFX 422 0 инҳо .
SFX 422 0 инҳоро .
SFX 422 0 инҳоянд .

SFX 423 N 1
SFX 423 0 инҳое .

SFX 424 N 2
SFX 424 0 инҷон .
SFX 424 0 инҷонам .

SFX 425 N 7
SFX 425 0 инӣ .
SFX 425 0 иниамро  .
SFX 425 0 иниаш .
SFX 425 0 иниву .
SFX 425 0 инии .
SFX 425 0 иниро .
SFX 425 0 инию .

SFX 426 N 14
SFX 426 0 ина .
SFX 426 0 инаам .
SFX 426 0 инаамон .
SFX 426 0 инаанд .
SFX 426 0 инаатон .
SFX 426 0 инаатонро .
SFX 426 0 инааш .
SFX 426 0 инаашон .
SFX 426 0 инаашонро .
SFX 426 0 инаашро .
SFX 426 0 инаву .
SFX 426 0 инаи .
SFX 426 0 инаро .
SFX 426 0 инаю .

SFX 427 N 1
SFX 427 0 инаҳо .

SFX 428 N 1
SFX 428 0 инавор .

SFX 429 N 3
SFX 429 0 инагӣ .
SFX 429 0 инагиашро .
SFX 429 0 инагии .

SFX 430 N 1
SFX 430 0 инагон .

SFX 431 N 2
SFX 431 0 инае .
SFX 431 0 инаест .

SFX 432 N 1
SFX 432 0 инак .

SFX 433 N 2
SFX 433 0 инакҳо .
SFX 433 0 инакҳоро .

SFX 434 N 1
SFX 434 0 инакак .

SFX 435 N 1
SFX 435 0 инатоби .
