third_party/hunspell_dictionaries/tg_TG.dic
бепушт/348,15
бетартиб/852,859,344,345,853,855,862,627,15
бехар/395,397
ваҳш/852,5,7,29,859,344,355,356,360,361,409,411,402,855,420,853,856,31,14,15
вазн/25,852,35,94,7,8,29,859,855,421,425,432,434,436,437,438,446,447,448,449,571,14,15
варз/852,1,2,4,104,229,10,11,859,853,359,363,366,368,369,382,390,409,474,475,477,489,491,493,495,496,497,503,580,669
ваш/355,467
дод/25,852,35,36,39,43,49,2,839,91,3,857,94,95,97,4,842,858,5,6,7,8,163,229,231,232,254,257,29,10,11,859,862,853,356,453,863,14,15
ишроқ/859,403,409
кабуд/25,852,64,7,229,29,337,859,344,853,419,855,862,584,14,759,15,787,806
кашф/2,7,859,414,415,416,418,15
кулфатрас/369,374
микроиқтисод/414
мол/25,852,1,64,2,3,857,4,104,6,7,8,141,29,10,859,862,853,366,368,369,382,384,386,387,414,415,417,855,474,475,489,524,527,856,31,655,14,15
муфлиснавоз/344
навхар/369,395
нар/25,64,132,7,859,426,431,31,14,15
нарм/852,35,64,70,2,4,5,7,29,859,853,382,402,855,421,474,862,14,742,15
ноҳамвор/29,859,344,345,853,402,855
оҳан/25,852,2,857,7,229,231,232,237,29,859,402,855,421,436,853,862,863,580,14,15,796,787,813
офар/852,1,2,4,104,109,112,11,366,368,369,370,371,378,379,380,382,384,385,391,392,393
ошом/852,1,104,112,8,366,369,382,384,386,387,669
пӯс/1,104,109,369,370,374,377,382,474,31,636,651,669,15
пӯст/25,64,65,75,86,2,5,6,7,8,29,859,402,421,422,436,452,535,14,15
пӯш/852,1,2,4,104,10,11,859,366,368,369,370,374,375,378,380,381,382,383,385,386,384,474,475,502,862,610,611,613,614,615,616,612,31,636,649,651,655,661,663,669,15
пашм/25,852,64,65,4,7,8,147,29,859,855,421,426,427,428,432,436,853,552,569,14,15
писанд/35,1,2,3,4,5,7,8,859,366,369,374,378,382,389,390,14,15
порс/25,852,859,353,409,411,413,855,853,862,31,14,15
рангпар/369,374,376
рас/852,1,2,839,4,104,105,115,10,11,859,366,368,369,371,372,374,378,380,382,383,384,855,474,502,31,636,649,650,651,652,655,657,661,662,663,669,671,676,15
рих/421,432,433
сабз/25,852,1,64,2,3,857,104,5,7,291,294,29,859,853,356,366,369,382,394,855,420,426,429,431,435,474,496,502,862,580,584,31,651,655,649,663,669,14,742,759,761,15,775,787,806
самарқанд/852,64,2,29,859,362,409,855,853,580,14,15
санҷ/1,2,4,104,10,11,852,366,368,369,371,382,384,474,475,477,489,497,496,502,519,523,31,15
санг/25,852,64,75,2,4,5,6,7,8,195,198,302,29,337,338,859,853,855,421,424,425,436,437,441,442,443,447,449,453,862,535,536,537,552,554,586,597,31,14,722,726,729,15,787,789,803
селевк/344,367,409
сиёҳ/852,64,75,2,857,5,7,175,176,223,231,291,294,29,11,859,344,853,862,394,402,855,552,584,31,14,759,15,775,787,806
сипоҳ/25,852,2,4,5,7,231,239,29,859,862,853,360,409,411,413,855,31,627,14,15
сулф/35,5,366,368,369,382
суф/852,7,8,29,30,859,356,360,402,409,421,14,15,787
тобе/852,4,8,859,855,421,423,31,699
умр/25,852,64,2,3,857,4,5,6,7,8,163,29,11,859,346,853,580,14,15
файз/25,852,2,5,7,147,29,859,404,406,407,855,468,584,586,14,15
фарох/852,2,29,859,357,358,365,855,863,539,566,742,751,15
фахр/852,1,2,5,29,10,11,859,366,382,402,404,855,853,569,15
фирӯз/33,852,82,2,5,7,274,29,859,344,352,409,402,855,853,862,539,540,547,31,14,15,777
фурӯхам/852,369,374
хам/25,5,7,195,29,859,344,366,369,374,380,382,383,389,402,853,474,31,649,651,655,663,669,14,742,15
хилват/852,7,224,254,255,258,29,859,402,410,409,531,584,14,752,15,786
хоб/25,852,1,75,64,2,3,857,4,104,5,6,7,8,198,224,254,255,258,29,10,859,862,366,369,371,380,382,853,474,569,574,31,634,649,651,655,657,661,663,669,14,15
хом/852,64,86,2,4,5,7,29,859,862,853,360,855,31,14,15
чӯк/369,370,382,474
чам/1,104,859,366,382,409,862,636,668,669,15,787
чандвақт/35,426
шӯр/25,852,1,64,2,857,4,5,7,29,10,859,344,366,369,373,374,378,380,382,383,855,853,453,474,475,489,493,494,502,504,522,523,571,649,651,655,661,669,14,742,15,787
шеърофар/855,425,421
ширин/33,852,64,2,3,4,5,6,7,8,29,859,344,347,862,853,402,414,855,863,584,586,31,14,742,744,751,752,15,787
шитоб/1,2,4,104,5,7,29,10,11,859,366,369,381,382,31,669,679,15
шод/852,2,4,5,7,294,29,10,11,859,344,346,862,853,402,404,405,406,408,411,855,468,863,552,31,627,679,14,15
шом/25,852,2,5,7,8,29,319,859,409,411,412,855,853,14,15
